Florida, session 2026, SB946.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.â(1)âBeginning July 1, 2026, the Office of 18 Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability (OPPAGA) 19 shall conduct a study of state public and private employee 20 childcare assistance programs to evaluate whether a public 21 employee childcare assistance program should be implemented in 22 this state. The scope of the study must, at a minimum, include 23 consideration of all of the following: 24 (a)âElements and operating procedures of other statesâ 25 childcare assistance programs. 26 (b)âThe potential benefits a Florida public employee 27 childcare assistance program would provide to residents of this 28 state and any cost savings it would provide to the state and its 29 workforce. 30 (c)âThe potential effects a Florida public employee 31 childcare assistance program would have on the stateâs school 32 readiness program, childcare workforce, and childcare regulation 33 and licensing. 34 (2)âIn conducting the study, OPPAGA must consult with the 35 Department of Educationâs Division of Early Learning overseeing 36 the school readiness program, the Department of Children and 37 Families childcare licensing office, the Florida Chamber of 38 Commerce, and any other entity OPPAGA deems relevant to carry 39 out the objectives of the study. 40 (3)âBy January 30, 2027, OPPAGA shall submit a report of 41 its findings and recommendations to the Governor, the President 42 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 43 The report must include potential options for establishing a 44 Florida public employee childcare assistance program that 45 enhances school readiness, advances the affordability of 46 childcare, and supports the stateâs workforce, all while 47 containing costs to the state. 48 (4)âThis section expires October 1, 2027. 49 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.